District of Columbia statutes.
2-1908

Privileged communications.

If a communication made by a communication-impaired person through an interpreter is privileged, the privilege extends also to the interpreter.

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 9, 34 DCR 7426
1981 Ed., § 31-2708.